Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.15.030

Foreign registration statement.

A foreign corporation may register to transact business in this state by delivering a foreign registration statement to the secretary of state for filing in accordance with RCW 23.95.510.

[ 2015 c 176 s 2132; 1989 c 165 s 171.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.